Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 157.16, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Delegation authorized. new text end new text begin The commissioner of health may delegate to a community health board, county, or city all or part of the authority for licensing, inspection, and enforcement under this chapter for food, beverage, and lodging establishments; public pools; and related public health activities. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 157.16, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1b. new text end new text begin Oversight. new text end new text begin The commissioner retains authority to monitor, audit, and rescind delegation if a delegated program fails to meet state standards. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 157.16, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1c. new text end new text begin Fees. new text end new text begin A city receiving delegation under this section may establish and collect fees by ordinance sufficient to cover the cost of administering the program. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 157.16, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1d. new text end new text begin Statewide delegation authorization; conversion. new text end new text begin (a) Upon completion of the city of Shakopee five-year pilot program in section 5 of this act, the commissioner shall authorize delegation under this section to any city that meets the requirements of subdivision 1 and demonstrates compliance with the standards established in this chapter. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall not deny delegation to a city based solely on population thresholds, jurisdictional classification, or prior statutory limitations that restrict delegation to counties or community health boards. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may adopt rules or guidance as necessary to implement statewide delegation consistent with the findings and recommendations of the pilot program reports in section 5 of this act. new text end new text begin (d) This subdivision is effective without further legislative action unless the legislature enacts a law modifying or repealing this subdivision prior to the expiration of the city of Shakopee pilot program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin CITY OF SHAKOPEE PILOT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Delegation. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the commissioner of health shall establish a pilot program to delegate authority under Minnesota Statutes, section 157.16, to the city of Shakopee. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must approve delegation under the pilot program to the city of Shakopee if the city demonstrates that it: new text end new text begin (1) employs or contracts with qualified environmental health professionals; new text end new text begin (2) maintains a program that meets or exceeds state standards for licensing, inspection, and enforcement; new text end new text begin (3) adopts ordinances consistent with Minnesota Statutes, chapter 157, and applicable rules; new text end new text begin (4) maintains data systems compatible with state reporting requirements; and new text end new text begin (5) enters into a written agreement with the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) The pilot program must be implemented within six months of final enactment. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner shall not deny participation in the pilot program based solely on population thresholds or jurisdictional classification. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Pilot program report. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning January 15 of the year following implementation, and annually thereafter, the commissioner of health, in coordination with the city of Shakopee, shall submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health policy and local government. new text end new text begin (b) The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) the number and type of inspections conducted; new text end new text begin (2) compliance rates and enforcement actions; new text end new text begin (3) comparison of inspection timelines and outcomes with state-administered programs; new text end new text begin (4) administrative costs and fee structures; new text end new text begin (5) feedback from regulated businesses; and new text end new text begin (6) recommendations regarding continuation, expansion, or modification of delegation authority to cities. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Minimum duration. new text end new text begin The pilot program must remain in effect for not less than five years from the date of implementation. The commissioner may not terminate the pilot program before the five-year period expires except for cause based on failure to meet state standards. new text end